sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Maloobchod > Papierové a plastové nákupné tašky: Nákupné tašky s pevnou rúčkou; Nákupné tašky s pevnou rúčkou; Nákupné tašky s jemnou rúčkou; Nákupné tašky v tvare trička
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Розничная торговля > Бумажные и пластиковые пакеты для покупок: Пакеты с вырубной ручкой; Пакеты с жесткой ручкой; Пакеты с петлевой ручкой; Пакеты-майки
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Retail > Papieren en plastic tassen: Gestanste tassen; Tassen met stevig handvat; Tassen met zachte lus; T-shirttassen
nb: Forretninger og industri > Detaljhandel > Handleposer i papir og plast: Figurskjærte handleposer; Handleposer med fast håndtak; Handleposer med mykt håndtak; Handleposer for T-skjorter
fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Jälleenmyynti > Paperiset ja muoviset ostoskassit: Muotoon leikatut ostoskassit; Jäykkäkahvaiset ostoskassit; Pehmeäkahvaiset ostoskassit; T-paitatyyppiset ostoskassit
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Retalho > Sacos de compras de papel e de plástico: Sacos de compras cortados; Sacos de compras com alça rígidos; Sacos de compras com laço suaves; Sacos de compras para t-shirts
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Trgovina > Papirnate in plastične nakupovalne vrečke: Nakupovalne vrečke z izsekanimi ročaji; Nakupovalne vrečke s trdimi ročaji; Nakupovalne vrečke z mehkimi zankami; T-Shirt vrečke
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Maloprodaja > Papirnate i plastične vrećice za kupnju: Vrećice za kupnju s urezanim ručkama; Vrećice za kupovinu sa čvrstom ručkom; Vrećice za kupnju s mekom ručkom; Vrećice za namirnice
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 零售 > 購物紙袋/塑膠袋: 模切購物袋; 硬提把購物袋; 軟繩圈購物袋; 塑膠袋
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 小売 > レジ袋・紙袋: ダイカット ショッピングバッグ; リジッドハンドル ショッピングバッグ; ソフトループ ショッピングバッグ; Tシャツ ショッピングバッグ
es: Economía e industria > Venta al por menor > Bolsas de plástico y papel: Bolsas de compra troqueladas; Bolsas de compra con asa rígida; Bolsas de compra de asa suave; Bolsas de compra de camisetas
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Perakende > Kağıt ve Plastik Alışveriş Çantaları: Kalıp Kesimli Alışveriş Çantaları; Sert Saplı Alışveriş Çantaları; Yumuşak Döngü Alışveriş Çantaları; Tişört Alışveriş Çantaları
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Retail > Pungi de cumpărături din hârtie și plastic: Pungi de cumpărături tăiate cu matrița; Pungi de cumpărături cu mâner rigid; Pungi de cumpărături cu mâner moale; Pungi de cumpărături tip maiou
it: Commercio e industria > Negozi > Sacchetti di carta e plastica: Borse per la spesa fustellate; Borse per la spesa con manico rigido; Borse per la spesa morbide; Borse per la spesa con magliette
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 零售业 > 纸质/塑料购物袋: 模切购物袋; 硬柄购物袋; 软环购物袋; T 恤购物袋
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การค้าปลีก > ถุงช้อปปิ้งที่เป็นกระดาษและพลาสติก: ถุงช้อปปิ้งไดคัท; ถุงช้อปปิ้งด้ามจับแข็ง; ถุงช้อปปิ้งซอฟต์ลูป; ถุงช้อปปิ้งหูหิ้ว
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Mažmeninė prekyba > Popieriniai ir plastikiniai pirkinių maišeliai: Pirkinių maišeliai, pagaminti štampiniu iškirtimu; Pirkinių maišeliai standžiomis rankenomis; Pirkinių maišeliai minkštomis rankenomis; „Marškinėlių“ tipo pirkinių maišeliai
sv: Företag och industri > Detaljhandel > Plastpåsar: Stansade shoppingpåsar; Shoppingpåsar med styva handtag; Shoppingpåsar med mjuka handtag; T-shirtshoppingpåsar
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Einzelhandel > Einkaufstüten aus Papier & Plastik: Gestanzte Einkaufstaschen; Einkaufstaschen mit starrem Griff; Einkaufstaschen mit weichem Schlaufengriff; T-Shirt-Einkaufstaschen
da: Erhverv og industri > Detail > Papir- og plastikposer: Die Cut indkøbsposer; Indkøbsposer med stivt håndtag; Soft Loop indkøbsposer; T-shirt-indkøbsposer
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Търговия > Хартиени и пластмасови торби за пазаруване: Пазарски чанти с изрязани дръжки; Пазарски чанти с твърда дръжка; Пазарски чанти с мека дръжки; Пазарски чанти тип „потник“
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 소매 > 종이/비닐 쇼핑백: 다이 컷 쇼핑백; 딱딱한 손잡이가 달린 쇼핑백; 부드러운 손잡이가 달린 쇼핑백; 일반 비닐봉지
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Prodejny > Papírové a plastové nákupní tašky: Nákupní tašky s vyřezaným otvorem pro ruku; Nákupní tašky s pevným držadlem; Nákupní tašky s měkkým úchytem; Igelitové nákupní tašky
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Λιανικό εμπόριο > Χάρτινες & πλαστικές σακούλες αγορών: Σακούλες αγορών με ενσωματωμένες λαβές; Σακούλες αγορών με άκαμπτες λαβές; Σακούλες αγορών με μαλακές λαβές; Σακούλες αγορών τύπου T-shirt
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Sprzedaż detaliczna > Papierowe i plastikowe torby na zakupy: Wycinane torby na zakupy; Torby na zakupy ze sztywną rączką; Torby na zakupy z miękkimi rączkami; Torby na zakupy T-shirt
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Bán lẻ > Túi mua sắm bằng giấy & nhựa: Túi mua sắm quai lỗ dập quả trám; Túi mua sắm quai cứng; Túi mua sắm quai mềm; Túi mua sắm siêu thị
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Kiskereskedelem > Papír és műanyag bevásárlótáskák: Kivágott bevásárlótáskák; Merev fogantyús bevásárlótáskák; Puhahurkos bevásárlótáskák; Póló-bevásárlótáskák
en: Business & Industrial > Retail > Paper & Plastic Shopping Bags: Die Cut Shopping Bags; Rigid Handle Shopping Bags; Soft Loop Shopping Bags; T-Shirt Shopping Bags
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Varejo > Sacolas de compras plásticas e de papel: Sacolas de compras cortadas; Sacolas de compras com alça rígida; Sacolas de compras com alça macia; Sacolas de compras para camisetas
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Commerce de détail > Sacs plastiques et sacs en papier: Sacs à provisions découpés; Sacs à provisions à poignée rigide; Sacs à provisions à boucle souple; Sacs à provisions t-shirts